Utah statutes.
7-23-402.   Electronic disbursement and collections.

If a deferred deposit lender collects payment on a deferred deposit loan through an electronic payment, the deferred deposit lender shall, on the day the loan is executed:

(1)  credit the amount of the deferred deposit loan through an electronic payment to the person receiving the deferred deposit loan; or

(2)  make the amount of the deferred deposit loan immediately available to the person receiving the deferred deposit loan.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 96, 2008 General Session

